District of Columbia statutes.
26-831.08

Capital requirements of a merchant bank.

(a)

The minimum amount of initial capital for a merchant bank shall be $20 million, of which at least $10 million shall be common stock or an equity interest. The balance may be composed of qualifying subordinated or similar debt as determined under regulations promulgated by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may modify the required minimum amount of initial capital if an applicant files with the Commissioner a written request and application, which application shall include a capital plan and any other documentation required by the Commissioner by regulation or order.

(b)

A merchant bank shall maintain minimum capital in at least the same amount as the minimum initial capital required under subsection (a) of this section or in such other amount as the Commissioner may establish by rule or by order, after the filing of a request and application by a merchant bank; provided, the Commissioner shall not establish a minimum capital requirement for a merchant bank that is less than 150% of the tier 1 risk-based capital or 150% of the total risk-based capital established by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System for a well-capitalized bank.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 308, 48 DCR 3244